Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-7109
Statewide clinical director; appointment; duties.

The statewide clinical director shall be appointed by the Critical Incident Stress Management Council until July 1, 2026, and by the Department of Health and Human Services on and after July 1, 2026. The statewide clinical director shall supervise and evaluate the professional and peer support team members, including the regional clinical directors, and until July 1, 2026, shall be a member of and work with the Interagency Management Committee for such purpose. The statewide clinical director may conduct critical incident stress management training and continuing education activities.

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 184, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 45.